Utah statutes.
31A-37a-103.   Applicable law.

(1) (a)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company is subject to:

(i)  this chapter; and

(ii)  Chapter 37, Captive Insurance Companies Act.

(b)  If there is a conflict between this chapter and Chapter 37, this chapter controls.

(2)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company is subject to a rule made under Section 31A-37-106 that is in effect on or after May 5, 2008.

(3)  The commissioner may, by order, exempt a special purpose financial captive insurance company from a provision of Chapter 37 or a rule made under Section 31A-37-106 if the commissioner determines that the application of the provision or rule is inappropriate on the basis of the special purpose financial captive insurance company's plan of operation.

